Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2143.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. The secretary of state shall enter into agreements with one
or more credit rating agencies for the release of information held by such
credit rating agency concerning residents of this state. Such information
shall include, but is not limited to, names, addresses, phone numbers,
social security numbers, dates of birth and alien registration numbers. The
secretary shall use such information to verify the United States citizenship
of persons who are registered to vote in this state. The secretary shall
notify the appropriate county election officer of the names of any
noncitizens who are registered to vote and direct such county election
officer to remove such person from the voter registration rolls. The county
election officer shall notify any person who is removed from the voter
registration rolls that such person may be reinstated on the voter
registration rolls by providing proof of such person's United States
citizenship.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.